California statutes. Education Code
 public, until the first vacancy of a member appointed pursuant to this paragraph that occurs on or after January 1, 2026, after which there shall be two representatives of the public. The occurrence of this vacancy shall not affect the status of the remaining two public representatives that had previously been appointed. None of these persons shall have been employed by an elementary or secondary school district in a position requiring certification, or shall have served as a school district governing board member in the five-year period immediately before the public member’s appointment to the commission.

(7) One school
 administrator in a public elementary or secondary school in California.

(8) One certificated human resources administrator in a public elementary or secondary school in California.

(9) One faculty member from a college or university that grants baccalaureate degrees.

(b) With the exception of the representatives of the public and the Superintendent, the appointment of a member shall terminate if the member is no longer a practicing teacher in a public elementary or secondary school or a teacher holding a commission-issued child development permit as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), a person who is employed on the basis of a valid services credential, a school administrator, a certificated human resources administrator, a faculty member of a college or university that grants baccalaureate degrees, a faculty member as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a),
 or a member of the governing board of a school district, as may be the case, in California.

(c) Not more than one member of the commission is to be appointed from the same school district or college or university campus.

(d) Commencing July 1, 1989, four members shall be appointed to the commission for terms of two years, five members for terms of three years, and five members for terms of four years.

(e) Each appointment pursuant to this section shall expire on November 20 of the year of expiration of the applicable term. All appointments made pursuant to this section are subject to Section 44213.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 181, Sec. 1.   (AB 1123)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44210.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that appointees to the commission reflect the ethnic and cultural diversity of the California public schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1355, Sec. 4.6.)
-------------------------------------------

44211.

Representatives of statewide organizations may submit for the Governor’s consideration the names of distinguished individuals to serve on the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44212.

(a) The Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, and the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities shall each appoint a representative to serve as an ex officio member without a vote in proceedings of the commission.

(b) The ex officio members shall not vote in the proceedings of the commission or in any of its committees or subcommittees, except, by a majority vote of the commission, ex officio members may be permitted to vote in committees or subcommittees in order to establish a quorum or as otherwise determined by majority vote of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 59.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

44213.

Except as otherwise provided pursuant to Section 44210, upon the expiration of the term of office of an appointive member of the commission, the member’s successor shall be appointed for a term of four years. No person shall be appointed by the Governor to serve more than two consecutive full terms. Prior service on the commission for a term of less than three years resulting from an initial appointment or an appointment for the remainder of an unexpired term shall not be counted as a full term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1355, Sec. 4.8.)
-------------------------------------------

44214.

If a member is absent from any four regularly scheduled meetings in any calendar year, his or her office as a member of the commission shall be deemed vacant. The chairperson of the commission shall forthwith notify the Governor that the vacancy exists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 216, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

44215.

Except as provided pursuant to Section 44217 with respect to private citizens, the members of the commission shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

44216.

Whenever an employee of any public school district, state college, or other public agency is appointed to membership on the commission, his employer shall grant him sufficient time away from his regular duties, without loss of income or other benefits to which he is entitled by reason of his employment, to attend meetings of the commission and to attend to the duties imposed upon him by reason of his membership on the commission. The employer of any such member may make available such stenographic, secretarial, and staff assistance as is reasonably necessary to enable him to execute the duties imposed upon him by reason of his membership on the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44217.

The compensation of the members of the commission who are public employees shall not be reduced by the agency or body by which they are regularly employed for any absence from service occasioned by attendance upon the business of the commission, its committees or subcommittees.

Each school district which employs a member of the commission and which is required to employ a person to replace such member during his attendance at meetings of the commission or any committee or subcommittee thereof, shall be reimbursed from the Teacher Credentials Fund for the cost incurred by employing a replacement.

A private citizen member may be provided from the Teacher Credentials Fund a stipend of up to fifty dollars ($50) per day, exclusive of per diem, for attendance at a meeting of the commission or any committee or subcommittee thereof, if such attendance results in loss of income.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

44218.

The commission by majority vote of all its members shall elect its own chairman from among its members.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44219.

The commission shall meet as deemed appropriate and necessary by the chairperson and the executive committee to accomplish its duties, but shall meet no fewer than once each quarter of the year.

In order that any allegation of misconduct and the effect thereof, if any, upon the application or credential of a certified employee are determined, as required by subdivision (b) of Section 44244, no later than six months after an investigation is commenced, the commission or the Committee of Credentials shall meet more frequently than once each quarter, if possible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 73, Sec. 6.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

44220.

(a) The commission shall appoint an executive director, who shall be exempt from the provisions of the State Civil Service Act, and may in its discretion remove him or her by a majority vote of all its members. He or she shall be the secretary to the commission and its chief executive officer. He or she shall receive the salary that the commission determines, and, subject to appropriation, other prerequisites that the commission determines.

(b) Any power, duty, purpose, function, or jurisdiction that the commission may lawfully delegate is delegated to the executive director, unless the commission specifically has reserved the same for its own action.

(c) Pursuant to subdivision (aa) of Section 11126 of the Government Code, the commission may hold closed sessions when considering matters relating to the recruitment, appointment, employment, or removal of the executive director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1050, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44221.

The commission may employ personnel as necessary to carry out its duties and responsibilities. The staff of the commission shall be subject to the provisions of the State Civil Service Act contained in Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

All persons, other than temporary employees, serving in the state civil service and engaged in the performance of a function transferred to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing or engaged in the administration of a law, the administration of which is transferred to the commission, shall remain in the state civil service and may request transfer to the commission or remain with the department on the effective date of this section. The status, position, and rights of any person shall
 not be affected by his or her transfer and shall continue to be retained pursuant to the State Civil Service Act, except as to positions the duties of which are vested in a position that is exempt from civil service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 53, Sec. 1.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44221.1.

(a) The Governor may appoint one deputy to the executive director of the commission. A deputy to the executive director appointed pursuant to this section shall be exempt from state civil service pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 4 of Article VII of the California Constitution.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that appointments to the exempt position described in subdivision (a) do not result in an increase in the amount appropriated to the commission in the annual Budget Act or a net increase in the expenditures of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 889, Sec. 1.   (SB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

44222.

The Department of Education shall assist the commission in any manner the commission may request in implementing this chapter; provided that the department shall be reimbursed from the Teacher Credentials Fund for any expenses incurred in assisting the commission or the Committee of Credentials.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44223.

(a) (1) The commission and the department shall develop a survey no later than July 1, 2023, for purposes of collecting data from teachers of local educational agencies resigning their positions or electing not to accept a teaching assignment for the upcoming school year, including data on whether or not they are exiting the profession.

(2) In developing the survey pursuant to paragraph (1), the commission and the department
 shall gather input from education stakeholders.

(b) On and after the commencement of the 2023–24 school year, a local educational agency
 is encouraged to administer the survey developed by the commission and the department within 15 days of a teacher of the local educational agency resigning their position or electing not to accept a teaching assignment for the upcoming school year.

(c) In developing the survey pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission and the department may use existing resources, including, but not limited to, the California School Climate, Health, and Learning Survey.

(d) A local educational agency is encouraged to report the results of surveys
 administered pursuant to subdivision (b) to the commission on an annual basis.

(e) (1) The commission shall work with the department to prepare an annual report that compiles the data provided pursuant to subdivision (d), submit the report to the department and the Legislature, and post the
 report on its internet website.

(2) A report to be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(3) Paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be implemented only upon appropriation of funds for this purpose by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or in another statute.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that
 the data from the surveys shall be used to examine future statewide investments on teacher recruitment and retention efforts.

(g) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter
 school maintaining kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 924, Sec. 1.   (SB 1487)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

44224.

(a) For purposes of this section, “campaign” means the public awareness campaign described in subdivision (b).

(b) The commission shall contract with a public relations organization, or other organization with similar expertise, to develop a public awareness campaign that highlights the value and benefits of educational careers in California’s public schools, spanning from prekindergarten and kindergarten to elementary and secondary schools serving pupils in any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(c) The campaign shall recognize the value of the contributions made by public school teachers and encourage individuals to
 enter the teaching profession.

(d) The campaign shall include information about available high-quality teacher credentialing pathways and available financial supports.

(e) The campaign may include, but is not limited to, the development and distribution of statewide public service announcements relating to teacher recruitment and outreach to high school pupils and college students.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the cost of the public awareness campaign established by this section not exceed nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 671, Sec. 1.   (AB 934)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

44225.

The commission shall do all of the following:

(a) Establish professional standards, assessments, and examinations for entry and advancement in the education profession. While the Legislature recognizes that the commission will exercise its prerogative to determine those requirements, it is the intent of the Legislature that standards, assessments, and examinations be developed and implemented for the following:

(1) (A) The preliminary teaching credential, to be granted upon possession of a baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education, completion of an accredited program of professional preparation, and either successful passage of an examination or assessment that
 has been adopted or approved by the commission in the subject or subjects appropriate to the grade level to be taught, to include college-level reading, writing, and mathematics skills, or completion of an accredited program of subject matter preparation and successful passage of the basic skills proficiency test as provided for in Article 4 (commencing with Section 44250). The commission shall uniformly consider the results of the basic skills proficiency test in conjunction with other pertinent information about the qualifications of each candidate for a preliminary credential, and may award the credential on the basis of the overall performance of a candidate as measured by several criteria of professional competence if the candidate meets minimum standards set by the commission on each criterion. Upon application by a regionally accredited institution of higher education, the commission may categorically grant credit to coursework completed in an accredited program of professional preparation, as
 specified by this paragraph, by undergraduates of that institution, if the commission finds there are adequate assurances of the quality of necessary undergraduate instruction in the liberal arts and in the subject area or areas to be taught.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for single subject teaching credentials, the baccalaureate degree shall not be in the subject of professional education.

(2) The professional teaching credential, to be granted upon successful passage of a state examination or assessment in the subject or subjects appropriate to the grade level to be taught, to include college-level basic reading, writing, and mathematics skills, and completion of a period of beginning teacher support that includes assessments of ability to teach subject matter to pupils, ability to work well with pupils, classroom management, and instructional skills. A candidate who
 successfully passes the examination or assessment pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed to have passed the state examination or assessment in the subject or subjects to be taught pursuant to this paragraph.

(b) (1) Reduce and streamline the credential system to ensure teacher competence in the subject field or fields, while allowing greater flexibility in staffing local schools. The commission shall award the following types of credentials to applicants whose preparation and competence satisfy its standards:

(A) Basic teaching credentials for teaching in kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, in public schools in the state.

(B) Credentials for teaching adult education classes and vocational education classes.

(C) Credentials for teaching specialties, including, but not necessarily limited to, bilingual education, early childhood education, and special education. The commission may grant credentials to any candidate who concurrently meets the commission’s standards of preparation and competence for the preliminary basic teaching credential and the preliminary specialty credential.

(D) Credentials for school services, for positions including, but not necessarily limited to, administrators, school counselors, speech-language therapists, audiologists, school psychologists, library media teachers, supervisors of attendance, and school nurses.

(2) The commission may establish standards and requirements for preliminary and professional credentials of each type.

(c) Review and, if necessary, revise the code of ethics
 for the teaching profession.

(d) Establish standards for the issuance and renewal of credentials, certificates, and permits. In setting standards, the commission shall seek to ensure, through its credentialing of teachers, that public school teachers satisfy all of the following criteria:

(1) Are academically talented.

(2) Are knowledgeable of the subjects to be taught in the classroom.

(3) Are creative and energetic.

(4) Have the human skills to motivate and inspire pupils to achieve their goals.

(5) Have the sensitivity to foster self-esteem in pupils through recognition that each pupil has their own goals, talents, and
 levels of development.

(6) Are willing to relate the educational process and their instructional strategies to meet the needs of pupils.

(7) Are able to work effectively with and motivate pupils from a variety of ethnic, socioeconomic, cultural, academic, and linguistic backgrounds.

(8) Have an understanding of principles and laws related to educational equity, and the equitable practice of the profession of education among all pupils regardless of their ethnicity, race, gender, age, religious background, primary language, or disabling condition.

(e) Determine the scope and authorization of credentials to ensure competence in teaching and other educational services, and establish sanctions for the misuse of credentials and the misassignment of
 credentialholders. The commission may grant an added or supplementary authorization to a credentialholder who has met the requirements and standards of the commission for the added or supplementary authorization. The commission shall exempt the holder of a teaching credential obtained before January 1, 1974, who adds an authorization by successfully completing a commission-approved subject matter examination, from the requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 44259 and Section 44261.

(f) Collect, compile, and disseminate information regarding exemplary practices in supporting and assessing beginning teachers.

(g) Establish alternative methods for entry into the teaching profession, and into other certificated roles in the schools, by persons in varying circumstances, including persons who have been educated outside of California, provided that each applicant satisfies all of the
 requirements established by the commission. One alternative method shall be the successful completion of at least two years of classroom instruction under a district intern certificate pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 44325). In establishing alternative methods for entry into the teaching profession, the commission shall develop strategies to encourage classroom aides to become credentialed teachers.

(h) Adopt a framework and general standards for the accreditation of preparation programs for teachers and other certificated educators pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 44320).

(i) Appoint classroom teachers, school administrators, other school services personnel, representatives of the public, and public or private higher education representatives to one or more standing committees, which shall be given authority to recommend to the commission standards
 relating to examinations, performance assessments, program accreditation, and licensing. The commission shall establish criteria for membership on those committees, and shall determine the terms of committee members. Appointments to standing committees by the commission shall reflect, to the extent feasible, the ethnic and cultural diversity of the California public schools.

(j) Consult with classroom teachers, faculty members from institutions of higher education that maintain accredited programs of professional preparation for teachers, administrators or other school services personnel, and other experts to aid in the development of examinations and assessments, and to study the impact of examinations and assessments on the teaching profession. To increase the fairness of its certification decisions, the commission may uniformly consider the results of tests, subtests, and assessments in conjunction with each other, and in conjunction with
 other pertinent information about the qualifications of each candidate. The commission may award credentials on the basis of average overall performances by candidates on several criteria of professional competence if the candidate meets minimum standards set by the commission on each criterion.

(k) Adopt standards for all examinations and assessments that shall ensure that all prospective teachers demonstrate an understanding of the history and cultures of the major ethnic populations of this state and of teaching strategies for the acquisition of English language skills by non-English-speaking pupils.

(l) Determine the terms of credentials, certificates, and permits, except that no credential, certificate, or permit shall be valid for more than five years from the date of issuance. This article shall govern the issuance of any credential, certificate, or permit, except as
 follows:

(1) A credential, certificate, or permit shall remain in force as long as it is valid and continues to be valid under the laws and regulations that were in effect when it was issued.

(2) The commission shall grant teaching credentials pursuant to statutes that were in effect on December 31, 1988, to candidates who, before the effective date of regulations to implement subdivision (a), were in the process of meeting the requirements for teaching credentials that were in effect on December 31, 1988, except that neither enrollment as an undergraduate student nor receipt of a baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education before the effective date of the regulations shall, by itself, exempt a candidate from the requirements of subdivision (a). Enrollment in a preparation program for teachers before the effective date of the regulations shall
 not exempt a candidate from the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), if the preliminary credential of the candidate was granted after the effective date of the regulations.

(m) (1) Review requests from school districts, county offices of education, private schools, and postsecondary institutions for the waiver of one or more of the provisions of this chapter or other provisions governing the preparation or licensing of educators. The commission may grant a waiver upon finding that the professional preparation equivalent to that prescribed under the provision or provisions to be waived will be, or has been, completed by the credential candidate or candidates affected, or that a waiver is necessary to accomplish any of the following:

(A) Give a local educational agency one semester or less to address unanticipated, immediate, short-term shortages
 of fully qualified educators by assigning a teacher who holds a basic teaching credential to teach outside of the teacher’s credential authorization, with the teacher’s consent.

(B) Provide credential candidates additional time to complete a credential requirement.

(C) Allow local school districts or schools to implement an education reform or restructuring plan.

(D) Temporarily exempt from a specified credential requirement small, geographically isolated regions with a severely limited ability to develop personnel.

(E) Provide other temporary exemptions when deemed appropriate by the commission.

(2) No provision in this chapter shall be waived under Sections 33050 and 33051, after June
 30, 1994, by the state board.

(n) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission develop models for voluntary use by California colleges and universities that do not have these models in place, to assist in the screening of applications for admission to teacher education programs. The models shall give emphasis to the following qualifications of the applicants: academic talent, knowledge of subjects to be taught, basic academic skills, creativity, experience in working with children and adolescents, ability to motivate and inspire pupils, and willingness to relate education to pupils with a wide variety of cultural, ethnic, and academic backgrounds. The commission may continue to administer the state basic skills proficiency test, in order (1) to use the results of this test in awarding preliminary teaching credentials and emergency permits, and (2) to enable colleges and universities to use this test in conjunction with other
 appropriate sources of information in teacher preparation admission decisions. However, it is the intent of the Legislature that applicants for admission to teacher preparation programs shall not be denied admission solely on the basis of state basic skills proficiency test results. The commission may recover the costs of administering and developing the test by charging examinees a fee for taking the test.

(o) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission encourage colleges and universities to design and implement, by August 1, 1990, concentrated internship programs for persons who have attained a baccalaureate degree in the field in which they intend to teach. Those programs would be targeted at subject area shortages, would substitute for conventional training programs, and would include a full summer session of college-level coursework, a one-year internship, or the equivalent, a seminar throughout the internship, and a summer
 session following the internship. Educator preparation through internship programs shall be subject to Article 10 (commencing with Section 44370).

(p) Grant a field placement certificate to a candidate who has been admitted to an accredited program of professional preparation, and who must complete a supervised practicum in public elementary or secondary schools as a condition for completion of the program. The commission shall establish standards for the issuance of field placement certificates.

(q) Propose appropriate rules and regulations to implement Chapter 1355 of the Statutes of 1988.

(r) Adopt subject matter assessments for teaching credentials after developing those assessments jointly with the Superintendent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 2.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44225.5.

The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall adopt standards for the issuance of teaching credentials to persons who received a score equal to or exceeding the minimum acceptable score set by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 76.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44225.6.

(a) By April 15 of each year, the commission shall report to the Legislature and the Governor on the availability of teachers in California. This report shall include all of the following information:

(1) The number of individuals recommended for credentials by institutions of higher education and each type of credential, certificate, or authorization for which they were recommended, including authorizations issued pursuant to Sections 44253.3 and 44253.4.

(2) The number of individuals recommended for credentials by school districts operating district internship programs and each type of credential, certificate, or authorization for which they were recommended, including authorizations issued
 pursuant to Sections 44253.3 and 44253.4.

(3) The number of individuals receiving an initial credential based on a program completed outside of California and each type of credential, certificate, or authorization for which they were recommended, including authorizations issued pursuant to Sections 44253.3 and 44253.4.

(4) The number of individuals receiving an emergency permit or credential waiver.

(5) The number of individuals receiving the certificate of completion of staff development in methods of specially designed content instruction delivered in English pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 44253.11.

(6) Statewide, by county, and by school district, the number of individuals serving in the following capacities and as a
 percentage of the total number of individuals serving as teachers statewide, in the county, and in the school district:

(A) University internship.

(B) District internship.

(C) Emergency-style permit, including any emergency permit, short-term staff permit, or provisional intern permit.

(D) Waiver of certification.

(E) Teaching permit for statutory leave issued pursuant to Division 8 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(F) Preliminary or clear credential.

(G) An authorization issued pursuant to Section 44253.3.

(H) Certificates or authorizations issued pursuant to Section 44253.3, 44253.4, 44253.10, or 44253.11, if available.

(I) The number of individuals serving English learner pupils in settings calling for English language development, in settings calling for specially
 designed academic instruction in English, or in primary language instruction, without the appropriate authorization under Section 44253.3, 44253.4, 44253.10, or 44253.11, or under another statute, if available. The commission may use data from the department’s Annual Language Census Survey to report the data required pursuant to this paragraph.

(7) The specific subjects and teaching areas in which there are a sufficient number of new holders of credentials to fill the positions currently held by individuals with emergency permits.

(b) The commission shall make this report available to school districts and county offices of education to assist them in the recruitment of credentialed teachers and shall make the report and supporting data publicly available on the commission’s internet website.

(c) A common measure of
 whether teacher preparation programs are meeting the challenge of preparing increasing numbers of new teachers is the number of teaching credentials awarded. The number of teaching credentials recommended by these programs and awarded by the commission are indicators of the productivity of teacher preparation programs. The commission shall include in the report prepared for the Legislature and the Governor pursuant to subdivision (a) the total number of teaching credentials recommended by all accredited teacher preparation programs authorized by the commission and the number recommended by each of the following:

(1) The University of California system.

(2) The California State University system.

(3) Independent colleges and universities that offer teacher preparation programs approved by the commission.

(4) Other institutions that offer teacher preparation programs approved by the commission.

(d) The commission shall periodically provide reports and recommendations to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, regarding the state’s teacher workforce for purposes of developing and reviewing state policy, identifying workforce trends, and identifying future needs. These reports shall be made publicly available on the commission’s internet website. The commission may make use of information obtained from the department, including, but not necessarily limited to, information obtained pursuant to Section 44258.9, for these purposes.

(e) The commission may use information obtained from the department garnered
 through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System to facilitate the development of the annual Teacher Supply Report as outlined in subdivision (a) and to analyze and publicly report educator workforce trends, including, but not limited to, recipients of commission-issued grants, teacher shortage indicators defined in subdivision (b) of Section 44258.9, preparation program workforce placements, and workforce mobility, retention, and attrition.

(f) For purposes of this section, “authorization” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 44203.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 57.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44225.7.

(a) The commission may approve a school district request for the assignment of an individual pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 44225 or Section 44300 if the district has certified by an annual resolution of the governing board that it has made reasonable efforts to recruit a fully prepared teacher for the assignment. If a suitable fully prepared teacher is not available to a school district, the district under all circumstances shall make reasonable efforts to recruit an individual for the assignment, in the following order:

(1) A candidate who is qualified to participate and enrolls in an approved internship program in the region of the school district.

(2) A candidate who is scheduled to complete preliminary credential requirements within six months. The commission shall assure that the employer will provide orientation, guidance, and assistance to the candidate.

(b) If a suitable individual who meets the priorities listed in subdivision (a) is not available to the school district, the district, as a last resort, may request approval for the assignment of a person who does not meet that criteria.

(c) As the supply of teaching interns increases as a result of legislative efforts to expand the Alternative Certification Program, the commission shall notify school districts that state policy directs the assignment of interns to classrooms when available in a given region, with decreased reliance on persons serving on emergency permits or credential waivers.

(d) As the supply of fully prepared teachers increases as a result of the Legislature’s efforts to recruit and retain qualified teachers for California classrooms, the commission shall notify school districts that state policy directs the assignment of fully prepared teachers to California classrooms, with the use of permits or waivers only when school districts are geographically isolated from teacher preparation programs or in the case of unanticipated, short-term need for the assignment of personnel.

(e) As used in this section, a “fully prepared teacher” means an individual who has completed a teacher preparation program. For purposes of this subdivision, a “teacher preparation program” means either a set of courses, including supervised field experience, or an equivalent alternative program, that provides a curriculum of systematic preparation for serving as an educator in California public schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 518, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

44225.8.

(a) All teacher preparation programs, regardless of program sponsor, including, but not limited to, local educational agencies or other programs that are not accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges, shall provide information to prospective candidates regarding the license examination passage rates of completers of its program for the most recent available year, if that data is available electronically through the Internet Web site of the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), “provide” includes placement of an Internet Web site address labeled as an access point for data on the passage rates of program completers on the Internet Web site of the program where enrollment information for the program is also located, on an Internet Web site that provides
 centralized admissions information for postsecondary educational systems or programs with multiple campuses, or on an application for enrollment or other program information distributed to prospective candidates.

(c) The commission shall provide all teacher preparation programs with the appropriate electronic link to comply with the provisions of subdivision (a). To the extent feasible, the link may also include access to additional data from the commission and from the California Longitudinal Teacher Integrated Data Education System regarding the types of programs offered and data on program effectiveness.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 248, Sec. 2.   (AB 2086)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

44226.

The commission may receive donations, bequests, grants, and philanthropic funding, subject to such conditions or restrictions as the executive director of the commission may deem advisable, and subject to the approval of the Director of Finance as provided in Section 11005 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 51, Sec. 25.   (SB 75)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

44227.

(a) The commission may approve any regionally accredited institution of higher education to recommend to the commission the issuance of credentials to persons who have successfully completed a teacher education program of the institution if the program meets the standards approved by the commission.

(b) A regionally accredited institution of higher education whose teacher education program has been accredited by the commission shall approve and electronically submit credential applications to the commission, and the commission shall grant credentials to these applicants based upon that approval.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission may approve for